test/data/dictyamls/dict-gt-yamls/V-lex_koccod_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - koččođ: # not checked
    koččođ+V+Inf: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koˊčom
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koˊčoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččo
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: koččovettee
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: koččov
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: koččop
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: koččovetteđ
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: koččoh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kuččum
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kuččuh
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kočoi
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kočoin
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kočoim
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kočoid
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kuččuu
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg1: koččoččim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg2: koččoččih
    koččođ+V+Cond+Sg3: koččoččij
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du1: koččoččáim
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du2: koččoččáid
    koččođ+V+Cond+Du3: koččoččáin
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl1: koččoččijm
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl2: koččoččijd
    koččođ+V+Cond+Pl3: koččoččii
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg1: koččoeem
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg2: koččoeeh
    koččođ+V+Pot+Sg3: koččo
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du1: koččoeen
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du2: koččovettee
    koččođ+V+Pot+Du3: koččouv
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl1: koččoep
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl2: koččovetteđ
    koččođ+V+Pot+Pl3: koččoeh
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg1: koččoom
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kočo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kočos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du1: koččoon
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du2: koččoo
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Du3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: koččoop
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: koččođ
    koččođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: koččoos
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Cond+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+Pot+ConNeg: XXX
    koččođ+V+PrsPrc: koččoee
    koččođ+V+PrfPrc: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio: koččom
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ess: koččomin
    koččođ+V+Actio+Loc: koččomist
    koččođ+V+Actio+Ill: XXX
    koččođ+V+Ger: koččodijn
    koččođ+V+VAbess: koččohánnáá
